Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 18.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1018
Qualified business, defined.

(1) For a tourism
development project, qualified business means any business engaged in:

(a) Cultural development;

(b) Historical
redevelopment;

(c) Recreation facilities;

(d) Entertainment destination centers;

(e) Lodging;

(f) Destination
dining;

(g)
Tourism attraction;

(h) Nebraska crafts
and products center; or

(i) Any combination of the activities listed in this subsection.

(2) For a redevelopment
project, qualified business means any business engaged in:

(a) Cultural development;

(b) Historical
redevelopment;

(c) Recreation facilities;

(d) Entertainment
destination centers;

(e) Mixed-use projects;

(f) Lodging;

(g) Full-service restaurants
or destination dining;

(h) Residential development;

(i) Retail development;

(j) Structured
parking;

(k) Tourism attraction;

(l) Nebraska crafts and products center;
or

(m)
Any combination of the activities listed in this subsection.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 18.